src/morphology/stemparts/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_YHTIÖT



0    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;


LEXICON N_PIPPALOT


0         N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0         N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0         N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0         N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0         N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0         N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0         N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0         N_COMPOUND_N ;
0         N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_NEUVOTTELUT


0    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;

LEXICON N_JÄRJESTÖT


0    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;

LEXICON N_SÄÄNNÖT


0:nö    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:nö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:nö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:tö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_LUOLIKOT



0:o    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:o    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0:ko      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:o    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:o    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:o    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;

LEXICON N_TÖLPÄKÖT


0:kö      N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;


LEXICON N_ONNET




0:i       N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:e     N_BACK_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:e     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:e     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
0:e     N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_MÄET





0:i     N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ke     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_KÄRJET





0:je    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:j     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:k     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:je       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_KLUMPIT





0:i     N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pe    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:p     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_PANKIT





0:i     N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ke     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:k     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_FÄNRIKIT





0:i     N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ke     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_PINSETIT





0:i     N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:te    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:te    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:t     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ti       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_TUNNIT


0:ni    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:te    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:ne     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:te    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:t     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ti       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ni        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_LAMMET





0:me    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:p     N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:m     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:p     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:p     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:p     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:me       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_LAMMIT





0:mi     N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:me     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pe    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:p     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:mi        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_RIMMIT





0:mi     N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:me     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:p     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:mi        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_LAET





0:e     N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:k     N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:k     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:k     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:k     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_KORVET





0:vi     N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:ve     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pe    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:p     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:vi        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_RIIVET





0:vi     N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:ve     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:p     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:vi        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;


LEXICON N_SUKAT


0:k   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:k   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:k   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:k   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_TÖLPÄT







0:ä    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:p   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:p   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:p   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:p   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:pä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:pä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_ROTAT







0:a   N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:to N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ta     N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_KENTÄT







0:ä    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:t   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_LUHDAT







0:da  N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:to N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:do   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:da  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_RIUTAT







0:a   N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:to N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ta     N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_REIÄT






0:ä    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:’ä    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:k   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:’    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:k   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:k   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:kä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:k   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:kä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:’ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:kä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_JUOVAT







0:va    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0:p   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:v    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:p   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:p   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:p   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:va   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_RANGAT







0:ga  N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:ko N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:go   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ko  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ga  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ko   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_KENGÄT


0:gä    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:k   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:g    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:k   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:k   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:kä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:k   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:kä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:gä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:kä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_KUNNAT







0:na  N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:t  N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:n    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:t   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:t   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:na  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t    N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;


LEXICON N_HÄNNÄT







0:nä    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:t   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:n    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:nä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_RANNAT







0:na  N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:to N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:no   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:na  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_KARRAT







0:ra  N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:to N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ro   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ra  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;
